fi: Kotelon tilavuus (perät × akselit): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Muu
ko: 케이스 수납 용량(버트 × 샤프트): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; 기타
sv: Fodralets kapacitet (ändar × skaft): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Annat
es: Capacidad del estuche (culatas × flechas): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Otro
lt-LT: Dėklo talpa (rankenos x kotai): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Kita
fr: Capacité de l’étui (talons et flèches): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Autre
bg-BG: Капацитет на калъфа (долни части × шафтове).: 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Друго
ro-RO: Capacitate carcasă (butt-uri × arbori): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Altele
vi: Sức chứa hộp (cán × thân): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Khác
sl-SI: Prostornina kovčka (kapice × palice): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Drugo
nl: Koffer inhoud (stelen × schachten): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Overige
ja: ケース容量（バット×シャフト）: 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; その他
da: Etuikapacitet (skaft × spids/ender): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Andet
cs: Kapacita pouzdra (spodní díly × vršky): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Jiné
hr-HR: kapacitet kutije (kundaci × osovine): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Ostalo
zh-CN: 收纳盒容量（底座 × 杆数）: 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; 其他
pt-BR: Capacidade da caixa/estojo (pontas × hastes): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Outro
nb: Eske-kapasitet (kolber × sjakter): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Annet
th: ความจุของกล่อง (ด้ามไม้คิว × ไม้ชาฟท์): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; อื่นๆ
de: Kofferkapazität (Unterteile × Oberteile): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Sonstige
el: Χωρητικότητα θήκης (άκρα × άξονες): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Άλλο
hu: Tok kapacitása (nyelek × spiccek): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Egyéb
pt-PT: Capacidade da caixa (pontas × eixos): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Outra
en: Case capacity (butts × shafts): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Other
tr: Kılıf kapasitesi (ıstaka dipleri × şaftlar): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Diğer
ru: Вместимость кейса (турняки × шафты): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Другое
zh-TW: 盒子容量（槍托×軸) 球桿盒容量 (後節 × 前節): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; 其他
sk-SK: Kapacita puzdra (terče × šípy): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Iná
pl: Pojemność etui (butty × shafty): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Inne
it: capacità cassa (coppie × aste): 1x1; 1x2; 1x3; 1x4; 2x2; 2x3; 2x4; 3x5; 3x6; 4x8; Altro